Maryland, session 2025, SB0624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–402.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0624*

SENATE BILL 624
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (f) of this section, a person may not
remove or attempt to remove human remains from a burial site.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the State’s Attorney for a county may
authorize in writing the removal of human remains from a burial site in the State’s
Attorney’s jurisdiction:
(1) to ascertain the cause of death of the person whose remains are to be
removed;
(2) to determine whether the human remains were interred erroneously;
(3) for the purpose of reburial; or
(4) for medical or scientific examination or study allowed by law.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph [(4)] (2) of this subsection, the State’s
Attorney for a county shall require a person who requests authorization to relocate
permanently human remains from a burial site to [publish a notice of the proposed
relocation in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the burial site is
located] PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION OF APPROVAL OF THE RELOCATION BY THE
OFFICE OF CEMETERY OVERSIGHT.
(2) [The notice shall be published in the newspaper one time.
(3) The notice shall contain:
(i) a statement that authorization from the State’s Attorney is being
requested to remove human remains from a burial site;
(ii) the purpose for which the authorization is being requested;
(iii) the location of the burial site, including the tax map and parcel
number or liber and folio number; and
(iv) all known pertinent information concerning the burial site,
including the names of the persons whose human remains are interred in the burial site, if
known.
(4)] (i) The State’s Attorney may authorize the temporary relocation of
human remains from a burial site for good cause, notwithstanding the [notice]
requirements of this subsection.
(ii) If the person requesting the authorization subsequently intends
to relocate the remains permanently, the person promptly shall [publish notice] REQUEST

SENATE BILL 624 3
APPROVAL FROM THE OFFICE OF CEMETERY OVERSIGHT as required under [this
subsection] § 10–402.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(5) The person requesting the authorization from the State’s Attorney shall
pay the cost of publishing the notice.
(6) The State’s Attorney may authorize the removal of the human remains
from the burial site after:
(i) receiving proof of the publication required under paragraph (1)
of this subsection; and
(ii) 15 days after the date of publication.
(7)] (3) This subsection may not be construed to delay, prohibit, or
otherwise limit the State’s Attorney’s authorization for the removal of human remains from
a burial site.
[(8)] (4) For a known, but not necessarily documented, unmarked burial
site, the person requesting authorization for the removal of human remains from the burial
site has the burden of proving by [archaeological excavation or another acceptable method]
METHODS APPROVED BY THE OFFICE OF CEMETERY OVERSIGHT the precise location
and boundaries of the burial site.
(d) (1) Any human remains that are removed from a burial site under this
section shall be reinterred in:
(i) 1. a permanent cemetery that provides perpetual care; or
2. a place other than a permanent cemetery with the
agreement of a person in interest as defined under § 14–121(a)(4) of the Real Property
Article; and
(ii) in the presence of:
1. a mortician, professional cemeterian, or other individual
qualified in the interment of human remains;
2. a minister, priest, or other religious leader; or
3. a trained anthropologist or archaeologist.
(2) The location of the final disposition and treatment of human remains
that are removed from a burial site under this section shall be entered into the local burial
sites inventory or, if no local burial sites inventory exists, into a record or inventory deemed
appropriate by the State’s Attorney or the Maryland Historical Trust.

SENATE BILL 624
(e) This section may not be construed to:
(1) preempt the need for a permit required by the Maryland Department of
Health under § 4–215 of the Health – General Article to remove human remains from a
burial site; or
(2) interfere with the normal operation and maintenance of a cemetery, as
long as the operation and maintenance of the cemetery are performed in accordance with
State law.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, human remains or
the remains of a decedent after cremation, as defined in § 5–508 of the Health – General
Article, may be removed from a burial site within a permanent cemetery and reinterred in:
(i) the same burial site; or
(ii) another burial site within the boundary of the same permanent
cemetery.
(2) The following persons, in the order of priority stated, may arrange for
a reinterment of remains under paragraph (1) of this section:
(i) the surviving spouse or domestic partner of the decedent;
(ii) an adult child of the decedent;
(iii) a parent of the decedent;
(iv) an adult brother or sister of the decedent;
(v) a person acting as a representative of the decedent under a
signed authorization of the decedent; or
(vi) the guardian of the person of the decedent at the time of the
decedent’s death, if one has been appointed.
(3) (i) The reinterment under paragraph (1) of this subsection may be
done without the need for obtaining the authorization of the State’s Attorney under
subsection (b) of this section or [providing the notice required under subsection (c) of this
section] FROM THE OFFICE OF CEMETERY OVERSIGHT UNDER § 10–402.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(ii) 1. A person who arranges for the reinterment of remains
within a permanent cemetery under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection, within 30 days
after the reinterment, shall publish a notice of the reinterment in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county where the permanent cemetery is located.

SENATE BILL 624 5
2. The notice shall be published in the newspaper one time.
3. The notice shall contain:
A. a statement that the reinterment took place;
B. the reason for the reinterment;
C. the location of the burial site from which remains have
been removed, including the tax map and parcel number or liber and folio number;
D. the location of the burial site in which the remains have
been reinterred, including the tax map and parcel number or liber and folio number; and
E. all known pertinent information concerning the burial
sites, including the names of the persons whose cremated remains or human remains are
interred in the burial sites, if known.
(iii) Within 45 days after the reinterment, a person who arranges for
a reinterment of remains under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection shall provide a copy of
the notice required under this paragraph to the Office of Cemetery Oversight.
(4) The location of a reinterment of remains under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall be entered into the inventory of the local burial sites or, if no inventory
exists, into a record or inventory deemed appropriate by the Maryland Historical Trust.
(g) (1) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a fine not exceeding $10,000
or both.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 7–506 AND 7–507 OF
THE COURTS ARTICLE, ALL FINES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
REMITTED TO THE CEMETERY OVERSIGHT FUND UNDER § 5–205 OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE.
(h) A person who violates this section is subject to § 5–106(b) of the Courts Article.
10–402.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF CEMETERY
OVERSIGHT.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, BEFORE
SEEKING AUTHORIZATION FROM A STATE’S ATTORNEY TO PERMANENTLY

SENATE BILL 624
RELOCATE HUMAN REMAINS UNDER § 10–402 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE PERSON
SEEKING TO PERMANENTLY RELOCATE THE REMAINS SHALL:
(1) PROMINENTLY POST NOTICE OF THE REQUEST AT THE BURIAL
SITE IN A FORM APPROVED BY THE OFFICE;
(2) PUBLISH NOTICE OF THE PROPOSED RELOCATION IN A
NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE BURIAL SITE
FROM WHICH THE HUMAN REMAINS ARE BEING RELOCATED CONTAINING:
(I) A STATEMENT THAT AN APPLICATION TO RELOCATE HUMAN
REMAINS FROM A BURIAL SITE HAS BEEN FILED WITH THE OFFICE;
(II) THE REASON FOR THE RELOCATION;
(III) THE LOCATION OF THE EXISTING BURIAL SITE, INCLUDING
THE TAX MAP AND PARCEL NUMBER, OR LIBER AND FOLIO NUMBER OF THE SITE;
(IV) ALL KNOWN PERTINENT INFORMATION CONCERNING THE
BURIAL SITE, INCLUDING THE NAMES OF THE INDIVIDUALS WHOSE HUMAN REMAINS
ARE INTERRED IN THE BURIAL SITE; AND
(V) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE OFFICE REQUIRES;
AND
(3) PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE INTENT TO PERMANENTLY RELOCATE
THE HUMAN REMAINS TO POTENTIAL DESCENDANTS IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY
THE OFFICE.
(C) A PERSON REQUESTING AUTHORIZATION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
PAY THE COST OF PUBLISHING NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF
THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) NOT EARLIER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER PROVIDING NOTICE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON SEEKING TO
RELOCATE HUMAN REMAINS FROM A BURIAL SITE SHALL SUBMIT AN APPLICATION
FOR AUTHORIZATION TO RELOCATE HUMAN REMAINS ON A FORM DEVELOPED BY
THE OFFICE.
(2) THE OFFICE MAY APPROVE A REQUEST TO PERMANENTLY
RELOCATE HUMAN REMAINS IF:

SENATE BILL 624 7
(I) AT LEAST 30 DAYS HAVE PASSED SINCE THE APPLICANT
PROVIDED NOTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE APPLICANT PAYS AN APPLICATION FEE SET BY THE
OFFICE.
(E) AN APPLICANT WHO IS AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN § 10–402(F)(2) OF
THIS SUBTITLE, OR AN ADULT DIRECT DESCENDANT OF THE DECEDENT, IS NOT
REQUIRED TO PROMINENTLY POST NOTICE AT A BURIAL SITE OR PROVIDE NOTICE
TO POTENTIAL DESCENDANTS.
(F) (1) ON WRITTEN REQUEST BY ANY PERSON MADE WITHIN 30 DAYS
AFTER THE PUBLICATION AND POSTING OF NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION, THE OFFICE SHALL REQUIRE THE APPLICANT SEEKING
AUTHORIZATION TO HOLD AN INFORMATIONAL MEETING REGARDING THE
APPLICATION.
(2) THE INFORMATIONAL MEETING REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE CANCELED IF EACH PERSON WHO MADE TIMELY REQUESTS
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHDRAWS THE REQUEST BEFORE
THE MEETING.
(G) (1) IF AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN § 10–402(F)(2) OF THIS
SUBTITLE, OR AN ADULT DIRECT DESCENDANT OF THE DECEDENT, REQUESTS TO
REINTER HUMAN REMAINS FOR WHICH AN APPLICATION TO RELOCATE HAS BEEN
FILED, THE OFFICE OF CEMETERY OVERSIGHT SHALL DELAY THE REINTERMENT
PROCESS FOR 90 DAYS.
(2) DURING THE 90 DAYS DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE OFFICE SHALL RESOLVE THE REQUEST FROM AN INDIVIDUAL
DESCRIBED IN § 10–402(F)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE, OR AN ADULT DIRECT
DESCENDANT OF THE DECEDENT.
(3) THE OFFICE MAY REQUIRE EVIDENCE OF THE RELATIONSHIP TO
THE DECEDENT BEFORE DELAYING A REINTERMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(H) ALL FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE REMITTED TO
THE CEMETERY OVERSIGHT FUND UNDER § 5–205 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION
ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 1, 2026,
the Maryland Department of Health shall, in consultation with the Office of Cemetery

SENATE BILL 624
Oversight, update regulations regarding disinterment and reinterment to carry out the
duties of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.